Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 3A Installation of Pre-owned Manufactured Homes

8-2-170.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Install” means to construct a foundation system and to place or erect a manufactured home on such foundation system. Such term includes, without limitation, supporting, blocking, leveling, securing, or anchoring such manufactured home and connecting multiple or expandable sections of such manufactured home.

“Manufactured home” means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, which, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length or, when erected on site, is 320 or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein; except that such term shall include any structure which meets all the requirements of this paragraph except the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the secretary of housing and urban development and complies with the standards established under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

“Pre-owned manufactured home” is any manufactured home that has been previously used as a residential dwelling and has been titled.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 306, § 1/SB 384.

8-2-171.
Health and safety standards for pre-owned manufactured homes; inspections; immunity.

On and after September 1, 2010, any person who is the owner of real property or who has a right to the use of real property may install and occupy a pre-owned manufactured home on such property, provided that such pre-owned manufactured home is in compliance with the provisions of this part and any applicable county or municipal zoning ordinances.

No county or municipality shall impose any health and safety standards or conditions based upon the age of a manufactured home.

A county or municipality may establish health and safety standards and conditions and an inspection program for pre-owned manufactured homes which are relocated from their current locations.

Neither a county or municipality nor any inspector thereof inspecting a pre-owned manufactured home pursuant to this Code section shall be liable for any injuries to persons resulting from any defects or conditions in such pre-owned manufactured home.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-171

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 306, § 1/SB 384.